Kentucky, session 2026RS, SB228.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the Commonwealth of Kentucky:
Section 1. KRS 75.160 is amended to read as follows:
(1) The chief of the fire department in fire protection districts shall attend all sessions
of the board, except executive sessions, and he or she shall execute all the orders of
the board. Whenever "chief" is used in KRS 75.100 to 75.260, it shall include the
assistant chief when the chief is not on duty.
(2) The regular members of the fire department in fire protection districts, except
volunteer firemen, shall have the same powers of arrest as now given by law to
sheriffs of this Commonwealth and they are hereby expressly declared conservators
of the public peace whose duties, in addition to their other prescribed duties, are to
conserve the peace, enforce all laws and preserve order, and they shall have and are
hereby expressly given the same right and the same power to arrest, search and
seize as is now given by law to sheriffs of this Commonwealth, and they shall be at
all times subject to the orders of the county judge/executive in which the fire district
lies while enforcing the provisions of this section. Provided, however, that members
of said fire departments shall not have the power to serve subpoenas, summonses
and notices in civil cases and they shall receive no fees for performing any of the
duties prescribed in this section as pertains to powers of law enforcement. The
members shall constitute a law enforcement agency in addition to the patrol and
investigation functions of the sheriff and his or her deputies under KRS 75.150 to
75.170.
Page 1 of 1
XXXX 2/24/2026 10:23 AM Jacketed